Idaho, session 2026, H0716.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 40-701, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
40-701. HIGHWAY DISTRIBUTION ACCOUNT -- APPORTIONMENT. (1) There is
established in the state treasury an account known as the "Highway Distribu-
tion Account," to which shall be credited:
(a) Moneys as provided by sections 63-2412(1)(f)4. and 63-2418(4),
Idaho Code;
(b) All moneys collected by the department, their its agents and ven-
dors, and county assessors and sheriffs, under the provisions of title
49, Idaho Code, except as otherwise specifically provided for; and
(c) All other moneys as may be provided by law.
(2)(a) The highway distribution account shall be apportioned as fol-
lows:
(a) Thirty-eight percent (38%) in fiscal year 2021, thirty-eight and
one-half percent (38.5%) in fiscal year 2022, thirty-nine percent (39%)
in fiscal year 2023, thirty-nine and one-half percent (39.5%) in fis-
cal year 2024, thirty-nine and three-quarters percent (39.75%) in fis-
cal year 2025, and forty percent (40%) thereafter to local units of gov-
ernment as provided in section 40-709, Idaho Code;
(b) Fifty-seven percent (57%) in fiscal year 2021, fifty-seven and one-
half percent (57.5%) in fiscal year 2022, fifty-eight percent (58%) in
fiscal year 2023, fifty-eight and one-half percent (58.5%) in fiscal
year 2024, fifty-nine and one-quarter percent (59.25%) in fiscal year
2025, and sixty percent (60%) thereafter to the state highway account
established in section 40-702, Idaho Code; and
(c) Five percent (5%) in fiscal year 2021, four percent (4%) in fiscal
year 2022, three percent (3%) in fiscal year 2023, two percent (2%) in
fiscal year 2024, one percent (1%) in fiscal year 2025, and zero dol-
lars thereafter to the law enforcement account, established in section
67-2914, Idaho Code. The state controller shall cause the remittance of


the moneys apportioned to local units of government not later than Jan-
uary 25, April 25, July 25 and October 25 of each year, and to the law
enforcement account and the state highway account as the moneys become
available to the highway distribution account.
(i) Forty percent (40%) to local units of government as provided
in section 40-709, Idaho Code; and
(ii) Sixty percent (60%) to the state highway account established
in section 40-702, Idaho Code.
(b) The state controller shall cause the remittance of the moneys ap-
portioned to local units of government no later than January 25, April
25, July 25, and October 25 of each year and to the state highway account
as the moneys become available to the highway distribution account.
(3) All new revenues generated by increases in registration fees and
fees on electric and hybrid vehicles pursuant to the provisions of House Bill
No. 312, as amended in the Senate, as amended in the Senate, during the first
regular session of the sixty-third Idaho legislature, and all revenues gen-
erated by fees on electric and plug-in hybrid vehicles pursuant to the provi-
sions of section 49-457, Idaho Code, shall be apportioned as follows:
(a) Forty percent (40%) to local units of government as provided in sec-
tion 40-709, Idaho Code; and
(b) Sixty percent (60%) to the state highway account established in
section 40-702, Idaho Code.
(4) (3) Interest earned on the investment of idle moneys in the highway
distribution account shall be paid to the highway distribution account.
(5) (4) All idle moneys in the dedicated highway trust or asset accounts
or subaccounts established from highway user revenues, reimbursements, fees
or permits shall be invested by the state treasurer in the same manner as pro-
vided under section 67-1210, Idaho Code, with respect to other surplus or
idle moneys in the state treasury. Interest earned on the investments shall
be returned to the various highway trust or asset accounts and subaccounts.
SECTION 2. That Section 63-2412, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2412. DISTRIBUTION OF TAX REVENUES FROM TAX ON GASOLINE AND AIR-
CRAFT ENGINE FUEL. (1) The revenues received from the taxes imposed by sec-
tions 63-2402 and 63-2421, Idaho Code, upon the receipt or use of gasoline,
and any penalties, interest, or deficiency additions, shall be distributed
periodically as follows:
(a) An amount of money equal to the actual cost of collecting, admin-
istering and enforcing the gasoline tax requirements by the commission,
as determined by it, shall be retained by the commission. The amount re-
tained by the commission shall not exceed the amount authorized to be
expended by appropriation by the legislature. Any unencumbered balance
in excess of the actual cost of collecting, administering and enforcing
the gasoline tax requirements by the commission at the end of each fis-
cal year shall be distributed as listed in paragraph (f) of this subsec-
tion.
(b) An amount of money shall be distributed to the state refund account
sufficient to pay current refund claims. All refunds authorized by the


commission to be paid shall be paid from the state refund account, and
those moneys are hereby continuously appropriated for that purpose.
(c) As soon as possible after the beginning of each fiscal year, the sum
of two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) shall be distributed
to the railroad grade crossing protection account in the dedicated
fund, to pay the amounts from the account fund pursuant to the provi-
sions of section 62-304C, Idaho Code.
(d) As soon as possible after the beginning of each fiscal year, the sum
of one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($175,000) three hundred
thousand dollars ($300,000) shall be distributed to the local bridge
inspection account in the dedicated fund, to pay the amounts from the
account pursuant to the provisions of section 40-703, Idaho Code.
(e) An amount of money equal to seven percent (7%) shall be distributed
to the state highway account established in section 40-702, Idaho Code.
(f) From the balance remaining with the commission after distributing
the amounts in paragraphs (a) through (e) of this subsection:
1. One and twenty-eight hundredths percent (1.28%) shall be
distributed as follows: sixty-six percent (66%) of the one and
twenty-eight hundredths percent (1.28%) shall be distributed to
the waterways improvement fund, as created in chapter 15, title
57, Idaho Code. Up to twenty percent (20%) of the moneys dis-
tributed to the waterways improvement account fund under the
provisions of this paragraph may be used by the department of parks
and recreation to defray administrative costs. Any moneys un-
used at the end of the fiscal year by the department of parks and
recreation shall be returned to the state treasurer for deposit
in the waterways improvement account fund. Thirty-three percent
(33%) of the one and twenty-eight hundredths percent (1.28%) shall
be distributed into the park and recreation capital improvement
account as created in section 57-1801, Idaho Code. One percent
(1%) of the one and twenty-eight hundredths percent (1.28%) shall
be distributed to the search and rescue fund created in section
67-2913, Idaho Code;
2. One and twenty-eight hundredths percent (1.28%) shall be
distributed as follows: sixty-six percent (66%) of the one and
twenty-eight hundredths percent (1.28%) shall be distributed to
the off-road motor vehicle account, as created in section 57-1901,
Idaho Code. Up to twenty percent (20%) of the moneys distributed
to the off-road motor vehicle account by this subparagraph may be
used by the department of parks and recreation to defray adminis-
trative costs. Any moneys unused at the end of the fiscal year by
the department of parks and recreation shall be returned to the
state treasurer for deposit in the off-road motor vehicle account.
Thirty-three percent (33%) of the one and twenty-eight hundredths
percent (1.28%) shall be distributed into the park and recreation
capital improvement account as created in section 57-1801, Idaho
Code. One percent (1%) of the one and twenty-eight hundredths
percent (1.28%) shall be distributed to the search and rescue fund
created in section 67-2913, Idaho Code; and


3. Forty-four hundredths percent (.44%) shall be distributed to
the park and recreation capital improvement account as created
in section 57-1801, Idaho Code, to be used solely to develop,
construct, maintain and repair roads, bridges and parking areas
within and leading to parks and recreation areas of the state.
4. The balance remaining shall be distributed to the highway dis-
tribution account created in section 40-701, Idaho Code.
(2) Provided however, the distribution pursuant to subsection (1) of
this section of revenues received from the taxes imposed pursuant to section
63-2402(2), Idaho Code, shall apply only to twenty-five cents (25¢) of ev-
ery thirty-two cents (32¢) received. The remaining seven cents (7¢) of ev-
ery thirty-two cents (32¢) received pursuant to the provisions of section
63-2402(2), Idaho Code, shall be distributed as follows: to the highway dis-
tribution account created in section 40-701, Idaho Code.
(a) Sixty percent (60%) to the state highway account; and
(b) Forty percent (40%) to be distributed pursuant to the provisions of
section 40-709, Idaho Code, in the same manner as distribution of mon-
eys appropriated from the highway distribution account to local units
of government.
(3) The revenues received from the taxes imposed by section 63-2408,
Idaho Code, and any penalties, interest, and deficiency amounts, shall be
distributed as follows:
(a) An amount of money shall be distributed to the state refund account
sufficient to pay current refund claims. All refunds authorized by the
commission to be paid shall be paid from the state refund account, and
those moneys are hereby continuously appropriated.
(b) The balance remaining of all the taxes collected shall be dis-
tributed to the state aeronautics fund, as provided in section 21-211,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 3. That Section 63-2418, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-2418. DISTRIBUTION OF TAX REVENUES FROM TAX ON SPECIAL FUELS. Un-
less as otherwise provided in subsection (5) of this section, revenues re-
ceived from the tax imposed by this chapter upon the receipt of special fuel
and any penalties, interest or deficiency additions, or from the fees im-
posed by the commission under the provisions of section 63-2424 or 63-2438,
Idaho Code, shall be distributed as follows:
(1) An amount of money equal to the actual cost of collecting, adminis-
tering and enforcing the special fuels tax provisions by the commission, as
determined by it, shall be retained by the commission. The amount retained
by the commission shall not exceed the amount authorized to be expended by
appropriation by the legislature. Any unencumbered balance in excess of the
actual cost of collecting, administering and enforcing the special fuels tax
requirements by the commission at the end of each fiscal year shall be dis-
tributed to the highway distribution account.
(2) An amount of money shall be distributed to the state refund account
sufficient to pay current refund claims. All refunds authorized by the com-
mission to be paid under this chapter shall be paid from the state refund ac-
count, those moneys being hereby continuously appropriated.


(3) An amount of money equal to seven percent (7%) shall be distributed
to the state highway account as established in section 40-702, Idaho Code.
(4) The balance remaining with the commission after distributing the
amounts specified in subsections (1), (2) and (3) of this section shall
be distributed to the highway distribution account established in section
40-701, Idaho Code.
(5) For those special fuels subject to tax pursuant to section 63-2402
or 63-2424, Idaho Code, twenty-five cents (25¢) of every thirty-two cents
(32¢) of revenue received from such tax shall be distributed pursuant to the
provisions of subsections (1), (2), (3) and (4) of this section. The remain-
ing seven cents (7¢) of every thirty-two cents (32¢) of the revenue received
shall be distributed as follows: to the highway distribution account cre-
ated in section 40-701, Idaho Code.
(a) Sixty percent (60%) to the state highway account; and
(b) Forty percent (40%) to be distributed pursuant to the provisions of
section 40-709, Idaho Code, in the same manner as distribution of mon-
eys appropriated from the highway distribution account to local units
of government.
SECTION 4. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.